District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.56

Articles of amendment — Contents.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 202, ch. 269, § 56
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(r), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.56.
1981 Ed., § 29-356.
1973 Ed., § 29-923.